Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Seed Certification

43-10-201. State seed certifying agency.

The commissioner of agriculture, the vice president of the University of Tennessee institute of agriculture, the dean of the University of Tennessee agriculture experiment station and the dean of the University of Tennessee extension service are vested with full authority to designate a crop improvement association as the official state seed certifying agency. The association shall be a member of the Association of Official Seed Certifying Agencies. These officials are further authorized, if satisfied that the association acting as official state seed certifying agency has not performed its duties in the best interests of Tennessee agriculture, to terminate the appointment of the association as the official state seed certifying agency.

Acts 1985, ch. 329, § 1.

43-10-202. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-10-202 (Acts 1985, ch. 329, § 1), concerning the creation of the state seed board, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 291, § 3. For new law see § 43-10-203.

43-10-203. Duties of the board of directors of the seed certifying agency.

The seed certifying agency's board of directors has control, management and supervision of the production, distribution and certification of purebred seeds in Tennessee under this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 329, § 1; 1995, ch. 291, § 4.

43-10-204. Applicability of provisions.

Any person, association, firm or corporation who issues, uses or circulates any advertisement, tag, seal, poster, letterhead or marketing circular containing any written or printed representation or description that such seeds offered for sale or use are “Tennessee Certified,” “Tennessee State Certified,” “State Certified,” or the equivalent utilizing words or symbols to imply conformity with the standards established by the state seed certifying agency, shall be subject to this part. This part does not apply, however, to the plant and plant product certification procedures concerning freedom from disease and insect infestation, as currently conducted by the plant industries division of the department of agriculture. Any issuance, use or circulation of any certificate or instrument, as defined in this part, shall be deemed “certification” for the purposes of this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 329, § 1.

43-10-205. Rules and regulations — Compliance with standards and procedures — Valid certifications.

The state seed certifying agency shall promulgate rules and regulations for the certification of seeds, plants or plant parts intended for growth, harvest, sale or distribution in Tennessee, with the exception of nursery crops, greenhouse crops, vegetable crops, strawberries and sweet potatoes.

All seeds, plants, or plant parts intended for growth, harvest, sale or distribution in Tennessee, with the exception of nursery crops, greenhouse crops, vegetable crops, strawberries and sweet potatoes, shall comply with the standards and procedures established by the state seed certifying agency in order to be eligible for certification.

No certification is valid unless issued by the state seed certifying agency established in this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 329, § 1; 1995, ch. 291, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of delegation of authority to official seed certifying agency to promulgate rules and regulations, OAG 95-052 (5/15/95).

Effect of termination of state seed board, OAG 95-052 (5/15/95).

43-10-206. Violations — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to issue, make, use or circulate any certification as provided for in this part, without authority from and the approval of the state seed certifying agency. Any person, firm, association or corporation who violates any provision of this part commits a Class A misdemeanor for each separate offense, and shall further be denied any right to apply for subsequent certification for such a period as the court sees fit but not to exceed one (1) year.

Acts 1985, ch. 329, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.